Missouri, session 2026, HB2630.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 21.110, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as section 21.110, to read as follows:
21.110. If the governor receives any resignation or notice of vacancy, or if he or she
2 is [satisfied] notified of the death of any member of either house, [during the recess,] he or
3 she shall[, without delay,] issue a writ of election within seven days to [supply] fill the
4 vacancy, unless such vacancy occurs after the fortieth Tuesday before the end of the
5 member's term.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.